Utah statutes.
59-2-1333.   Errors or omissions -- In assessment book -- Authority to
correct.
An omission, error, defect in form in the assessment roll, or clerical error,
when it can be ascertained what was intended, may, with the consent of the
county legislative body, be supplied or corrected by the assessor at any time
prior to the sale for delinquent taxes and after the original assessment was
made.
